trunk/apertium-swe-dan/dev/saldo/saldo.nouns.dix
<pardef n="emerit/us__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l>us</l>        <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>us</l>        <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>us</l>        <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>us</l>        <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ina</l>       <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="y__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l>y</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:s</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-s</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-et</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-t</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:et</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:t</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:n</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-n</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>-na</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>:na</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="nexus__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="yxhuvud__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ena</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="asyndeton__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="b/ok__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l>ok</l>        <r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oken</l>      <r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>öcker</l>     <r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>okar</l>      <r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>öckerna</l>   <r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>okarna</l>    <r>ok<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="gehenna__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="bränsleomvand/lare__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l>laren</l>     <r>lare<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rar</l>       <r>lare<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lare</l>      <r>lare<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rarna</l>     <r>lare<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="fotn/ot__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l>ot</l>        <r>ot<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oten</l>      <r>ot<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oter</l>      <r>ot<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ötter</l>     <r>ot<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oterna</l>    <r>ot<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ötterna</l>   <r>ot<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="purs/er__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ern</l>       <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ers</l>       <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rar</l>       <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ers</l>       <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ersen</l>     <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ersarna</l>   <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rarna</l>     <r>er<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="iktus__n_ut">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="imrör__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ena</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="skit__n_v">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ar</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>arna</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="thriller">        <i>thrill</i><par n="purs/er__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="globetrotter">    <i>globetrott</i><par n="purs/er__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="mätningstal">     <i>mätningstal</i><par n="imrör__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="bränsleomvandlare"><i>bränsleomvand</i><par n="bränsleomvand/lare__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="bulldozer">       <i>bulldoz</i><par n="purs/er__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="container">       <i>contain</i><par n="purs/er__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="gangster">        <i>gangst</i><par n="purs/er__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="icke-spridningsavtal"><i>icke-spridningsavtal</i><par n="imrör__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="piphuvud">        <i>piphuvud</i><par n="yxhuvud__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="fanskap">         <i>fanskap</i><par n="imrör__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="parser">          <i>pars</i><par n="purs/er__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="kålhuvud">        <i>kålhuvud</i><par n="yxhuvud__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="jämförelsetal">   <i>jämförelsetal</i><par n="imrör__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="asyndeton">       <i>asyndeton</i><par n="asyndeton__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="bunker">          <i>bunk</i><par n="purs/er__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="emeritus">        <i>emerit</i><par n="emerit/us__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="zonrör">          <i>zonrör</i><par n="imrör__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="receiver">        <i>receiv</i><par n="purs/er__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="iktus">           <i>iktus</i><par n="iktus__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="slughuvud">       <i>slughuvud</i><par n="yxhuvud__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="fiskredskap">     <i>fiskredskap</i><par n="imrör__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="hundhuvud">       <i>hundhuvud</i><par n="yxhuvud__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="slugger">         <i>slugg</i><par n="purs/er__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="blomhuvud">       <i>blomhuvud</i><par n="yxhuvud__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="studiosus">       <i>studios</i><par n="emerit/us__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="kontorslandskap"> <i>kontorslandskap</i><par n="imrör__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="läshuvud">        <i>läshuvud</i><par n="yxhuvud__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="barnhuvud">       <i>barnhuvud</i><par n="yxhuvud__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="synthesizer">     <i>synthesiz</i><par n="purs/er__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="pundhuvud">       <i>pundhuvud</i><par n="yxhuvud__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="grevskap">        <i>grevskap</i><par n="imrör__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="kvickhuvud">      <i>kvickhuvud</i><par n="yxhuvud__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="curlingbarn">     <i>curlingbarn</i><par n="imrör__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="y">               <i>y</i><par n="y__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="hästhuvud">       <i>hästhuvud</i><par n="yxhuvud__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="ljushuvud">       <i>ljushuvud</i><par n="yxhuvud__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="impediment">      <i>impediment</i><par n="imrör__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="hacker">          <i>hack</i><par n="purs/er__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="brohuvud">        <i>brohuvud</i><par n="yxhuvud__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="elfenbenstorn">   <i>elfenbenstorn</i><par n="imrör__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="transponder">     <i>transpond</i><par n="purs/er__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="ilsamtal">        <i>ilsamtal</i><par n="imrör__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="skit">            <i>skit</i><par n="skit__n_v"/></e>
<e lm="bok">             <i>b</i><par n="b/ok__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="fotnot">          <i>fotn</i><par n="fotn/ot__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="discessus">       <i>discessus</i><par n="nexus__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="diabetes">        <i>diabetes</i><par n="nexus__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="gehenna">         <i>gehenna</i><par n="gehenna__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="nystagmus">       <i>nystagmus</i><par n="nexus__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="primas">          <i>primas</i><par n="nexus__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="solarplexus">     <i>solarplexus</i><par n="nexus__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="epidermis">       <i>epidermis</i><par n="nexus__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="uterus">          <i>uterus</i><par n="nexus__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="glottis">         <i>glottis</i><par n="nexus__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="konditionalis">   <i>konditionalis</i><par n="nexus__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="nexus">           <i>nexus</i><par n="nexus__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="elefantiasis">    <i>elefantiasis</i><par n="nexus__n_ut"/></e>
<e lm="primus">          <i>primus</i><par n="nexus__n_ut"/></e>
